Hawaii statutes.
§514A-69 Remedies; sales voidable when and
by whom. Every sale made in violation of section 514A-68 is voidable at
the election of the purchaser; and the person making such sale and every
director, officer, or agent of or for such seller, if the director, officer, or
agent has personally participated or aided in any way in making the sale, is
jointly and severally liable to the purchaser in an action in any court of
competent jurisdiction upon tender of the units sold or of the contract made,
for the full amount paid by the purchaser, with interest, together with all
taxable court costs and reasonable attorney's fees; provided that no action
shall be brought for the recovery of the purchase price after two years from
the date of the sale and provided further that no purchaser otherwise entitled
shall claim or have the benefit of this section who has refused or failed to
accept within thirty days an offer in writing of the seller to take back the
unit in question and to refund the full amount paid by the purchaser, together
with interest at six per cent on such amount for the period from the date of
payment by the purchaser down to the date of repayment. [L 1977, c 98, pt of
§2]

Case Notes

Proof of reliance not element of cause of action. 588 F.
Supp. 889.

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next